Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB245.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9(b) and (e) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 9. Procedure.--* * *(b) (1) After the filing of any complaint, or whenever there is reason to believe that an unlawful discriminatory 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 practice has been committed, the Commission shall make a prompt investigation in connection therewith. If the Commission does not complete its investigation, it may, after one hundred eighty days of receiving a complaint, make a determination in accordance with subsection (c). A hearing under subsection (e) shall occur only if probable cause of disparate treatment exists and the parties choose not to settle.(2) The Commission shall send a copy of the complaint to the named respondent within [thirty] twenty days from the date of docketing the complaint, unless otherwise required by the Fair Housing Act[.] in accordance with the following:(i) The Commission shall not request information a second time after a respondent provides the information to the Commission's request.(ii) If a respondent fails to provide evidence or the Commission has reasonable proof that a respondent has failed to provide requested information, the Commission may request the Attorney General subpoena the information on behalf of the Commission.(3) A respondent shall file a written, verified answer to the complaint within [thirty] twenty days of service of the complaint, unless otherwise required by the Fair Housing Act. The Commission, upon request of the respondent, may grant an extension of not more than thirty additional days, unless otherwise required by the Fair Housing Act.(4) After service of the complaint, the Commission shall encourage voluntary and informed predetermination settlements between parties, including mediation by a neutral arbitrator under rules and procedures specified by the Commission.* * *20250HB0245PN0195 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) The case in support of the complaint shall be presented before the Commission or before a permanent hearing examiner designated by the Commission for the purpose of hearing said complaint by one of its attorneys or agents, by the complainant's attorney or by a designated agent of the complainant. The respondent may appear at such hearing in person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit testimony. The complainant may likewise appear at such hearing in person or otherwise, with or without counsel, and submit testimony. The Commission or the complainant shall have the power reasonably and fairly to amend any complaint, and the respondent shall have like power to amend his answer. The Commission shall not be bound by the strict rules of evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity. The Commission or the permanent hearing examiner shall make a determination within thirty days after the conclusion of the hearing. The testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and be transcribed[.] and shall be heard for a period of not more than five days. If the Commission or the permanent hearing examiner determines, upon request of either party, that more time is necessary, the hearing may extend an additional seven days.* * *(k) Only disparate treatment claims may be brought under this act. Disparate treatment may be proven by a repeated history and pattern of decisions that have a disparate impact on an individual class protected under this act.(l) Except as otherwise provided under law, an unlawful discriminatory practice is established when the complainant demonstrates that discrimination was a motivating factor for any employment practice, even though other factors also motivated 20250HB0245PN0195 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the practice.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 11.1. Reimbursement Against Wrongful Claims.-- After a hearing under section 9(e), if a claim against a defendant is determined to be unfounded, the defendant may seek and the Commission may award reimbursement for reasonable attorney fees incurred during the proceedings under section 9.Section 3. Section 12 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 12. Construction and Exclusiveness of Remedy.--* * *(g) Nothing in this act shall prohibit an employer from requiring an employe, during the employe's hours at work, to adhere to reasonable dress or grooming standards not prohibited by other provisions of Federal, State or local law.Section 4. Section 12.1 of the act is repealed:[Section 12.1. Local Human Relations Commissions.--(a) The legislative body of a political subdivision may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the establishment or membership in and support of a Local Human Relations Commission. The number and qualifications of the members of any local commission and their terms and method of appointment or removal shall be such as may be determined and agreed upon by the legislative body, except that no such member shall hold office in any political party. Members of a local commission shall serve without salary but may be paid expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.(b) The legislative body of any political subdivision shall have the authority to appropriate funds, in such amounts as may be deemed necessary, for the purpose of contributing to the operation of a local commission including the payment of its 20250HB0245PN0195 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 share of the salary of an investigator or staff member acting jointly for it and one or more other local commissions.(c) The local commission shall have the power to appoint such employes and staff, as it may deem necessary, to fulfill its purpose including the power to appoint an investigator or staff member to act jointly for it and one or more other local commissions.(d) The legislative bodies of political subdivisions shall have the authority to grant to local commissions powers and duties similar to those now exercised by the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission under the provisions of this act.(e) The local human relations commission shall notify the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission of complaints received involving discriminatory acts within that commission's jurisdiction.]Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 12.3. Local Human Relations Commissions Prohibited.-- (a) The legislative body of a political subdivision may not, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the establishment or membership in and support of a local human relations commission with the same powers as the Commission under this act.(b) This act shall apply to each local human relations commission. Each local human relations commission shall comply with the policies and procedures in place for the Commission.(c) A case brought before a local human relations commission may not be brought before the Commission.Section 6. The amendment of section 9(b) and (e) of the act shall apply to complaints filed with the commission under section 9(a) of the act on or after the effective date of this 20250HB0245PN0195 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0245PN0195 - 6 - 12